dictsource/af_rules
.group op
          _) opaal        %o@pA:l // fix o sound, remove break: opaal and compounds
             opaat        up'A:t // homeopaat/psigopaat and similar
             opatie       upat'i // homeopatie/neuropatie and similar
             opaties      up'A:tis // psigopaties/osteopaties and similar
             opaties      up'A:tis // allopaties/homopaties and similar
          K) opeen        _%Op_e@n
          _) ope (K       o@p@ //opehart opestelling etc./ope
             ope (l       o@p@ // dopeling/hopelik/opelug/opelyf
          _) ope (rig     o@p@ // fix stress: operig/-e
             opgee (+     'Opx2e@ // see rule: _) opge (@P4    Opx2@
          _) opge (@P4    'Opx2@ // stress on 1st slb
         &C) op (ig       'o@p // wanhopig/voorlopige
             op (lett     %Op // move default stress: oplettend/-e/-heid
             opper        Op@r // oppergesag/wese/vlak/man
             opper (vlakki %Op@r // move default stress: oppervlakkig/-e/-heid/-ste
             opsetlik     %OpsEtl@k // move default stress: opsetlik/-e/-heid
             op (sione@   %Op // fix stress vowel and s sounds: opsioneel/-nele
             optel        Opt&l
          _) op (@P2      'Op // opeet/opeis/optredes/opoffering
             open (+      o@p@n // open/opening/e/s
             open (b      %o@p@n openbaar/openbare/openbaring
          _) oper (A      %o@p@r // operateur/opereer
             operasie     %o@p@rA:si // fix stress operasie/hartoperasie, etc.
             opera (K     o@p@r%a // stress: opera/operas/operamusiek/-sanger
             op (houde    %Op // move default stress: (on)ophoudelik/-e
             opinie       o@p'ini // opinie/-s
             opium        o@piWm // fix vowel sounds: opium and compounds
          _) opmerkli (k  %Opm&rkl@ // move default stress: opmerklik/-e/-heid
             op (nuut     %Op // move default stress: opnuut
             op (offer    Op // fix o sound: selfopperende, etc.
             oppon (A     %Op@n // opponent/opponeer
             oppor (tu    %Op%Or // fix stress, strip p: opportunis/-me/-ties/opportuun
             oppos (isie  %Op@z // fix stress, 2nd o and s sounds, single p: opposisie/-s and compounds
          _) op (reg      %Op // move default stress: opreg/-te
             op (roerig   %Op // oproerig/-e/-heid, but oproer
             op (ruien    %Op // move default stress: opruiend/-e
             op (sienb    %Op // opsienbare/opsienbarend
          _) opsigteli (k %OpsIx2t@l@ // move default stress: opsigtelik/-e vs. opsig
          _) op (sy       %Op // move default stress: opsy and compounds
             opspraak     OpsprA:k // fix stress: opspraakwekkend/-e
             op (standig  %Op // move default stress: opstandig/-e/-heid
             opti (mA     %Opt%i // optimis/-me/-te/-ties/optimaal
          _) opu (s       o@pW // "op" not prefix: opus/-se
          _) op (vlieë    %Op // move default stress: opvlieënd/-e/-heid
          _) op (vall     %Op // move default stress: (on)opvallend/-e
             op (winde    %Op // move default stress: opwindend and derivatives


.group p
             p            p
             p (p
             ph (_        f // fix ph sound: Rudolph/Joseph
             phi (lip     fI
             phi (lippA_  f@ // fix stress and 1st i sound: Philippa/Philippi
          _) pieter (sA@  p%it@r // move default stress: pieters(i)elie and compounds
             pig (meA     p@x2 // move default stress: pigmee/pigmeë
             pi (kant     p%i // move default stress: pikant/-e, etc.
             pikke (wyn   p@k@ // move default stress: pikkewyn and compounds
          _) pi (la       p%i // move default stress: pilaar/pilare/pilatus
             pio (n       p%ijO // fix stress: pion/-ne and compounds of pion
             pio (nier    p%i%u // fix stress and vowel sounds: pionier and compounds
             pira (mi     p%ir%a // move default stress: piramide/-s/piramiedvormig
             pi (sto      p@ // pistool/pistole and compounds
             pizza        pitsa // fix zz sound: pizza and compounds
             pla (fon     pl%a // plafon and many compounds
             plagi (a     pl%ax2%i // fix stress: plagiaat and compounds/plagiator
          _) pla (kka     pl%a // move default stress: plakkaat/plakkate
             plane (tA    pl%an@' // planetarium/interplanetêr
             planete      pl%ane@t@ // move default stress and fix a sound: planete and compounds like planetebaan
             plant (aardi pl%ant_ // fix stress and insert short break: plantaardig/-e
             pla (stiek   pl%a // move default stress: plastiekjuwele/-versiersels...
          _) pla (ta      pl%a // move default stress: plataan/-boom/platane
             platinum (A  plA:tinWm_ // fix u sound, pause in compounds like: platinumaandele/-erts
             ple (k       pl&
             plei (dooi   pl%eI // (slot)pleidooi/-e
             plesier      pl@s'i:r
             plig         plIx2 // fix i sound: dienspligontduiker/pliguitvoering
          @) pligtig      pl'Ix2t@x2 // pligtig in compounds takes stress: dienspligtige, etc. 
             pof (add     pOf_ // fix o sound: (konings)pofadder/-s
             pole (miek   p%Ol@ // fix stress and o sound: polemiek and compounds
             po (lemie    p%u // fix stress and o sound: polemies/-e
             pol (fyn     p%Ol // move default stress: polfyntjie/-s
             po (liep     p%u // fix stress and o sound: poliep/-e/-agtig and compounds of poliep
             po (liesman  pu // fix o sound: poliesman/-ne
             poliëste (r  p%Ol%i;Est@ // fix stress and vowel sounds: poliëster(rok and other compounds)
             polio        po@liu // polio and compounds
          _) polis (K     p''o@l@s // fix stress and o sound: polis/-dokument and similar
             polisie      p%ulis%i
             polisi (eer  p%ul%is%i // fix stress and o sound: polisieer and derivatives
             polisië      p%ul%is%ie@ // fix stress and o sound: (gemeenskaps)polisiëring(sforum) and similar
             poli (tAAC   p%Ol@ // politiek/politoer and compounds
             polities     p%ulit%is // fix stress and o sound: polities/-e
          _) poli (C      p%o@l%i // polifonie/-s/poligamie/-s and many poli- words
             pol (vy      p%Ol // move default stress: polvy/-e and compounds
             pomelo       p%ume@l%u // fix stress and o sounds: pomelo(sap/-drankie...)
          _) pon (dok     p%On // move default stress: pondok/-ke/-kie
             pop (agtig   p%Op_ // fix o sound, insert break: popagtig(e) and compounds
             popu         ,pOpy
          _) por (C       %pOr //portret portaal etc.
             por (ie      p%o@r // move default stress: porie/-ë
             pori (eus    p%o@r%i // fix stress: porieus/-e
             porse (lein  p%Ors@ // fix stress and e sound: porselein and compounds
             por (sie     pOr // restore default stress: porsie/-s/-tjie
             por (stok    pOr // restore default stress: porstok/-ke
             portu (ge    p%Ort%y // fix stress: Portugees/Portugese
          _) pos (a       pOs //posadres/posadministrasie 
          pos (advert     p''Os_ // force stress on pos, insert pause: posadvertensie/-s
             posisie      p%uzis%i
          _) post (K      p'@Ust- //post where it means after
          _) post (u      p%Ost // move default stress: postuur/posture/postuum and compounds of postuur
          _) poten (C     p%utEn // fix stress and vowel sounds: potent/-e/potensie
             poten (sia   p%o@t%En // fix e sound: potensiaal/potensiale and compounds
             pot (sier    p%Ot // move default stress: potsierlik/-e/-heid
             pot (yster   pOt_ // fix o sound, insert pause: potyster/-tafel and similar compounds
             poësie       p%u:@zi // bieg/natuurpoësie/poëversameling, etc.
             poë (tA      p%u:e@ // poëties/-e/poëte
         ra) pporte (rA   p%Orte@ // fix stress and e sound: rapportering/rapporterende
             pseudo       sY@d%u // drop p sound: pseudo and compounds
             ps (igA      s // psigologie/kinderpsigoloog
             psige (delie s%ix2@ // move default stress: psigedelies/-e
       _nie) psige        ps@x2@ // restore p sound: geniepsige/-r
          _) psalm        p@sal@m // schwa between p and s
             psalmis      p@s%al@mIs // move default stress: psalmis/-te

             pub (li      p%Wb
             puntener     p%Wnt@ne@r // stress and 2nd e sound: puntenerig and derivatives
             pu (pil      p%y // move default stress: pupil/-le and compounds
             puri (tein   p%yr@ // fix stress and i sound: puritein/-e/-se
             pêre (C      p&:r@ // fix e sound: pêrelig/-e, pêredokter/-siekte
